Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.190

Purple heart state.

Washington state is designated a purple heart state that honors people who have received the purple heart award.

[ 2021 c 213 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 213: "(1) Washington state is grateful to be home to multitudes of United States armed forces members, veterans, and their families that have made the choice to protect freedom and our country.

(2) The purple heart medal is the oldest United States military decoration, dating back to 1782 when our state's namesake general George Washington created the badge of military merit to recognize heroic acts by his troops during the revolutionary war. Based on this example, the purple heart medal was created on George Washington's two hundredth birthday, February 22, 1932, and was made available for recognition of meritorious acts that occurred during World War I.

(3) Elizabeth Will designed the award to be a heart shaped medal with a profile image of general Washington that hangs from a purple ribbon.

(4) The purple heart medal is now presented to those members of the armed services who are killed or wounded in action as the result of an act of an enemy of the United States or in military combat.

(5) The state designated August 7th as purple heart recipient recognition day.

(6) The state offers a distinctive license plate for purple heart recipients.

(7) The state has multiple counties, cities, and locations that recognize portions of the transportation system as part of the purple heart trail.

(8) The designation of Washington as a purple heart state authorizes state agencies to honor purple heart recipients and recognize and proclaim the state as a purple heart state." [ 2021 c 213 s 1.]